Arkansas, session 2025, SB584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-101 is amended to read as follows:
7-9-101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Act” means an act having general application throughout the
state, whether originating in the General Assembly or proposed by the people;
(2) “Amendment” means an amendment to the Arkansas Constitution
that is proposed by the people;
(3) “Canvasser” means a person who circulates an initiative or
referendum petition or a part or parts of an initiative or referendum
petition to obtain the signatures of petitioners thereto;
(4) “Election” means a regular general election at which state
and county officers are elected for regular terms;
(5) "Local" means a county or municipality;
(5)(6) “Measure” means an amendment, an act, or an ordinance;
(6)(7) “Ordinance” means an ordinance of a municipality or
county, whether originating in the legislative body of the municipality or
county or proposed by the people;
(7)(8) “Petition part” means a petition signature sheet
*SSS298*
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
containing the information required under § 7-9-104 or § 7-9-105;
(8)(9) “Petitioner” means a person who signs an initiative or
referendum petition ordering a vote on a measure;
(9)(10) “Registered voter” means a person who is registered at
the time of signing the petition pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
51; and
(10)(11) “Sponsor” means a person who arranges for the
circulation of an initiative or referendum petition or who files an
initiative or referendum petition with the official charged with verifying
the signatures.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(a)(4), concerning the signing of a
petition, penalty for falsification, and notice of suspected forgery for
initiative petitions and referendum petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(4) A person shall not act as a paid canvasser on a statewide
initiative petition, or statewide referendum petition, local initiative
petition, or local referendum petition if the sponsor has not provided the
information required under § 7-9-601 to the Secretary of State before the
person solicits signatures on a petition to the:
(A) Secretary of State for a statewide initiative petition
or statewide referendum petition; and
(B) County clerk for a local initiative petition or local
referendum petition.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(c), concerning the signing of a
petition, penalty for falsification, and notice of suspected forgery for
initiative petitions and referendum petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(c) A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person, acting as a
canvasser, notary, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor:
(1) Signs a name other than his or her own to a petition;
(2) Prints a name, address, or birth date other than his or her
own on a petition unless the signer requires assistance due to disability and
the person complies with this section;
(3) Solicits or obtains a signature to a petition knowing that
the person signing is not qualified to sign the petition;
(4) Knowingly pays a person any form of compensation in exchange
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
for signing a petition as a petitioner;
(5) Accepts or pays money or anything of value for obtaining
signatures on a petition when the person acting as a canvasser, sponsor, or
agent of a sponsor knows that the person acting as canvasser's name or
address is not included on the sponsor's list filed with the Secretary of
State or the county clerk under § 7-9-601;
(6) Knowingly misrepresents the purpose and effect of the
petition or the measure affected for the purpose of causing a person to sign
a petition;
(7) As a canvasser, knowingly makes a false statement on a
petition verification form;
(8) As a notary, fails to witness a canvasser's affidavit by
witnessing the signing of the instrument in person and either personally
knowing the signer or being presented with proof of identity of the signer;
or
(9) As a sponsor, files a petition part with the official
charged with verifying the signatures knowing that the petition part contains
one (1) or more false or fraudulent signatures unless each false or
fraudulent signature is clearly stricken by the sponsor before filing.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(e), concerning the signing of a
petition, penalty for falsification, and notice of suspected forgery for
initiative petitions and referendum petitions and as amended by Acts 2025,
No. 273, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) The Secretary of State shall not count signatures collected and
witnessed by a canvasser for a statewide initiative petition or statewide
referendum petition and the county clerk shall not count signatures collected
and witnessed by a canvasser for a local initiative petition or local
referendum petition if the Secretary of State or the county clerk finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that the canvasser has violated Arkansas laws
regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery, or fraudulent practices in the
procurement of petition signatures or any provision of the Arkansas
Constitution applicable to the collection of signatures on an initiative
petition or referendum petition during the current election cycle.
(2) This subsection shall not constrain the duties and authority
of the Secretary of State or the county clerk as set forth in Arkansas law.
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-9-107 as amended by Acts 2025, No. 154,
is amended to read as follows:
7-9-107. Filing of original draft before circulation.
(a) Before any statewide initiative petition, or statewide referendum
petition, local initiative petition, or local referendum petition ordering a
vote upon any amendment or act shall be circulated for obtaining signatures
of petitioners, the sponsors shall submit the original draft with the:
(1) Attorney General for statewide initiative petitions and
referendum petitions; and
(2) The county clerk where the petition is being circulated for
local initiative petitions and referendum petitions in accordance with § 14-
14-917.
(b) The original draft shall include:
(1) The full text of the proposed measure;
(2) A ballot title for the proposed measure; and
(3) A popular name for the proposed measure.
(c) The Attorney General or the county clerk shall return to the
sponsor a file-marked copy of the original draft that shall serve as evidence
that the original draft was filed in compliance with this section.
(d)(1) Within ten (10) business days, the Attorney General or the
county clerk with the assistance of the county civil attorney shall approve
and certify or shall substitute and certify a more suitable and correct
ballot title and popular name for each amendment or act.
(2) The ballot title so submitted or supplied by the Attorney
General or the county clerk shall briefly and concisely state the purpose of
the proposed measure.
(e) If, as a result of his or her review of the ballot title and
popular name of a proposed initiated act, or a proposed amendment to the
Arkansas Constitution, or a local ordinance or resolution, the Attorney
General or the county clerk determines that the ballot title or the nature of
the issue, is presented in such manner that the ballot title would be
misleading or designed in such manner that a vote “FOR” the issue would be a
vote against the matter or viewpoint that the voter believes himself or
herself casting a vote for, or, conversely, that a vote “AGAINST” the issue
would be a vote for a viewpoint that the voter is against, or that the text
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
of the proposal conflicts with the United States Constitution or a federal
statute, the Attorney General or the county clerk with the assistance of the
civil attorney may reject the entire ballot title, popular name, and petition
and state his or her reasons therefor and instruct the petitioners to
redesign the proposed measure and the ballot title and popular name in a
manner that would not be misleading or in conflict with the United States
Constitution or a federal statute.
(f) If the Attorney General refuses to act or if the sponsors feel
aggrieved at the Attorney General's acts in such premises, the sponsors may,
by petition, apply to the Supreme Court for proper relief.
(g)(1) A sponsor shall not submit multiple initiative petitions or
referendum petitions that are conflicting measures to the Attorney General
under this section for review, except as follows:
(A) If an initiative petition or referendum petition is
certified under this section, a sponsor may submit an initiative petition or
referendum petition that is a conflicting measure with the certified
initiative petition or certified referendum petition after the date of the
next general election following the certification; or
(B) If an initiative petition or referendum petition is
rejected under this section, a sponsor may submit an initiative petition or
referendum petition that is a conflicting measure with the rejected
initiative petition or referendum petition.
(2)(A) The Attorney General shall reject all statewide
initiative petitions and statewide referendum petitions that are submitted by
a sponsor in violation of this subsection.
(B) The county clerk shall reject all local initiative
petitions and local referendum petitions that are submitted by a sponsor in
violation of this subsection in accordance with § 14-14-917.
(3) As used in this subsection, “conflicting measures” means two
(2) or more initiative petitions or referendum petitions that:
(A) Cover the same subject matter;
(B) Are for the same general purpose; and
(C) Contain different language in any part of their full
texts, ballot titles, or popular names.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 7-9-111(j) and (k), concerning a
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
determination on the sufficiency of petitions and as amended by Acts 2025,
No. 241, is amended to read as follows:
(j)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (j)(4) of this section, a
canvasser shall file a true affidavit with the Secretary of State for a
statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition and the county
clerk for a local initiative petition or local referendum petition certifying
that the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas Constitution and all
Arkansas law regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery, and fraudulent practices
in the procurement of petition signatures during the current election cycle.
(2) The Secretary of State or the county clerk shall not count
the signatures submitted by the canvasser until a true affidavit is submitted
under subdivision (j)(1) of this section.
(3) A true affidavit submitted under subdivision (j)(1) of this
section shall have no bearing to establish the genuineness or falsity of the
signatures obtained by the canvasser.
(4)(A) The inability of a canvasser to submit an affidavit due
to death or medical disability shall not disqualify the signatures gathered
by the canvasser.
(B) Subdivision (j)(4)(A) of this section does not excuse
a canvasser from filing the affidavit required under § 7-9-109.
(k) A canvasser who has filed a true affidavit under subsection (j) of
this section shall not collect additional signatures unless the Secretary of
State determines that the sponsor of the statewide initiative petition or
statewide referendum petition or the county clerk determines that the sponsor
of the local initiative petition or local referendum petition is eligible for
an amendment to the statewide initiative petition, or statewide referendum
petition, local initiative petition, or local referendum petition under
Arkansas Constitution, Art. 5, § 1.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(a)(1), concerning the hiring and
training of paid canvassers for initiative petitions and referendum
petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A person shall not provide money or anything of value to
another person for obtaining signatures on a statewide initiative petition,
or statewide referendum petition, local initiative petition, or local
referendum petition unless the person receiving the money or item of value
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
meets the requirements of this section.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(a)(2)(C) and (D), concerning the
hiring and training of paid canvassers for initiative petitions and
referendum petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) Provide a complete list of all paid
canvassers' names and current residential addresses to the:
(a) Secretary of State for statewide
initiative petitions and referendum petitions; and
(b) The county clerk where the petition will
be submitted for local initiative petitions and local referendum petitions.
(ii) If additional paid canvassers agree to solicit
signatures on behalf of a sponsor after the complete list is provided, the
sponsor shall provide an updated list of all paid canvassers' names and
current residential addresses to the:
(a) Secretary of State for statewide
initiative petitions and statewide referendum petitions; and
(b) The county clerk where the petition will
be submitted for local initiative petitions and local referendum petitions;
(D) Submit to the Secretary of State a copy of the signed
statement provided by the paid canvasser under subdivision (d)(3) of this
section to the:
(i) Secretary of State for statewide initiative
petitions and statewide referendum petitions; and
(ii) The county clerk where the petition will be
submitted for local initiative petitions and local referendum petitions;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(a)(3), concerning the hiring and
training of paid canvassers for initiative petitions and referendum
petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Upon filing the petition with the Secretary of State for a
statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition or with the
county clerk for a local initiative petition or local referendum petition,
the sponsor shall submit to the Secretary of State or the county clerk a:
(A) Final list of the names and current residential
addresses of each paid canvasser; and
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
(B) Signature card for each paid canvasser.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(b)(3), concerning the hiring and
training of paid canvassers for initiative petitions and referendum
petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Upon submission of the sponsor's list of paid canvassers to
the Secretary of State under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the sponsor
shall certify to the Secretary of State or the county clerk that each paid
canvasser in the sponsor's employ has no disqualifying offenses in accordance
with this section.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(f), concerning the hiring and
training of paid canvassers for initiative petitions and referendum
petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(f) Signatures incorrectly obtained or submitted under this section
shall not be counted by the Secretary of State or the county clerk for any
purpose.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(g)(1), concerning the hiring and
training of paid canvassers for initiative petitions and referendum
petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) It is unlawful for a person to pay or offer to pay a person, or
receive payment or agree to receive payment, on a basis related to the number
of signatures obtained on a statewide initiative petition, or statewide
referendum petition, local initiative petition, or local referendum petition.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 14-14-915(a), concerning county initiative
and referendum petition requirements, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Style Requirements of Petitions. A petition for county initiative
or referendum filed by the electors shall:
(1) Embrace only a single comprehensive topic and shall be
styled and circulated for signatures in the manner prescribed for county
ordinances and amendments to ordinances established in this section and § 7-
9-101 et seq.;
(2) Set out fully in writing the ordinance sought by
petitioners; or in the case of an amendment, set out fully in writing the
03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298

SB584
ordinance sought to be amended and the proposed amendment; or in the case of
referendum, set out the ordinance, or parts thereof, sought to be repealed;
and
(3)(A)(i) Contain a written certification of legal review by an
attorney at law duly registered and licensed to practice in the State of
Arkansas.
(ii) This legal review shall be conducted for the
purpose of form, proper title, legality, constitutionality, and conflict with
existing ordinances.
(iii) Legal review shall be concluded prior to the
circulations of the petition for signatures.
(B) No change shall be made in the text of any initiative
or referendum petition measure after any or all signatures have been
obtained; and
(4) Contain the full ballot title of the initiative or
referendum at the top of each signature page.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 14-14-915(b)(1), concerning county
initiative and referendum petition requirements, is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Initiative Petitions.
(A) All petitions for initiated county measures shall be
filed with the county clerk not less than ninety (90) calendar days nor more
than one hundred twenty (120) calendar days prior to the date established for
the next regular election.
(B) A petition sponsor shall comply with §§ 7-9-107 and 7-
9-601 before filing an initiative or referendum petition with the county
clerk in the county where the petition will be circulated.








03/31/2025 11:39:09 AM SSS298